Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201244-2129
Acquisition; divestiture; merger; prohibited
acts.

(1) It shall be a violation of section 44-2126 to fail
to file any statement, amendment, or other material required to be filed under
such section.

(2) It shall be a violation of section 44-2127 to effectuate or attempt
to effectuate an acquisition of control of,
divestiture of, or merger with a domestic insurer unless the director
has given his or her approval thereto.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 7.